Wyoming statutes. Title 2 Wills, Decedents' Estates and Probate Code
Revision of title. —

Section 1, ch. 54, Laws 1980, revised this title, amending §§

2-2-101

through

2-2-108

; amending and renumbering §§ 2-4-243 as

2-6-207

(d); and amending ch. 142, 1979, by amending §§

2-1-101

,

2-1-102

,

2-1-201

through

2-1-203

,

2-1-301

,

2-1-401

,

2-1-402

,

2-2-109

through

2-2-111

,

2-2-201

through

2-2-203

,

2-2-301

through 2-2-313,

2-2-401

through 2-2-407 and renumbering 2-2-405 and 2-2-406 as

2-2-403

and

2-2-404

,

2-3-101

through

2-3-120

,

2-3-201

through

2-3-211

,

2-4-101

through

2-4-108

,

2-4-201

through

2-4-214

,

2-5-101

through

2-5-103

,

2-6-101

through

2-6-111

,

2-7-101

through

2-7-110

,

2-7-201

through

2-7-206

,

2-7-301

through

2-7-307

,

2-7-401

and

2-7-402

; by amending and renumbering §§

2-1-403

as

2-1-402

(a)(ii),

2-1-404

through 2-1-406 as

2-1-403

through

2-1-405

,

2-2-310

through 2-2-313 as

2-2-309

through

2-2-312

, 2-2-405 and 2-2-406 as

2-2-403

and

2-2-404

,

2-3-122

through 2-3-139 as

2-3-121

through

2-3-138

, 2-3-215 through 2-3-219 as

2-3-301

through

2-3-305

, 2-3-221 through 2-3-223 as

2-3-401

through

2-3-403

, 2-3-225 through 2-3-228 as

2-3-501

through

2-3-504

, 2-3-231 through 2-3-244 as

2-3-601

through 2-3-614, 2-3-251 through 2-3-261 as

2-3-701

through 2-3-711, 2-5-201 as

2-5-104

, 2-5-202 as

2-5-105

,

2-6-201

through

2-6-207

as

2-6-112

through

2-6-118

,

2-6-301

as

2-6-119

,

2-6-302

as

2-6-120

, 2-6-401 through 2-6-411 as

2-6-201

through

2-6-211

, 2-6-501 through 2-6-506 as

2-6-301

through

2-6-306

,

2-7-501

through 2-7-512 as

2-7-403

through

2-7-414

,

2-7-601

through

2-7-609

as

2-7-501

through

2-7-509

,

2-7-701

through

2-7-727

as

2-7-601

through

2-7-627

,

2-7-801

through 2-7-819 as

2-7-701

through

2-7-719

, 2-7-901 through 2-7-914 as

2-7-801

through

2-7-814

, 2-7-1001 through 2-7-1003 as

2-8-101

through

2-8-103

,

2-7-110

1 through 2-7-1103 as

2-9-101

through

2-9-103

, 2-7-1201 through 2-7-1204 as

2-9-201

through

2-9-204

, 2-7-1301 through 2-7-1310 as

2-10-101

through

2-10-110

,

2-8-101

through 2-8-105 as

2-11-101

through

2-11-105

, 2-8-201 as

2-11-201

, 2-8-301 as

2-11-301

, 2-8-401 as

2-11-302

, 2-8-402 as

2-11-303

,

2-9-101

through 2-9-106 as

2-12-101

through

2-12-106

,

2-10-101

through

2-10-107

as

2-13-101

through

2-13-107

,

2-11-101

as

2-14-101

,

2-12-101

as

2-14-201

,

2-12-102

as 2-14-202, 2-8-202 through 2-8-204 as

2-15-101

through

2-15-103

and

2-13-101

through

2-13-104

as

2-15-104

through

2-15-107

.

No detailed explanation of the changes made by the 1980 act has been attempted, but, where appropriate, historical citations to former provisions have been added to corresponding sections in this title, and annotations from cases decided under former provisions have been placed under comparable sections in this title where it was felt they would be helpful.

Section 2, ch. 54, Laws 1980, repealed §§ 2-4-111 through 2-4-113, 2-4-240 through 2-4-242 and 2-5-809, and §§

2-2-309

,

2-2-403

,

2-2-404

, 2-2-407,

2-3-121

, 2-3-245 and 2-3-246 as created by ch. 142, Laws 1979.

Section 3, ch. 54, Laws 1980, reads: “If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are severable.”